Utah statutes.
9-6-501.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Endowment fund" means any arts endowment fund created under this chapter
by a qualifying organization.
(2)  "Qualifying organization" means any Utah nonprofit arts organization that
qualifies under this chapter to create an endowment fund, receive state money
into the endowment fund, match state money deposited into the endowment fund,
and expend interest earned on the endowment fund.
(3)  "State fund" means the Utah Arts Endowment Fund created under Section
9-6-502.
